Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5610.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 67.16 RCW to read as follows:The commission may impose fees, as the commission deems reasonable and appropriate, in order to pay federal fees and be in compliance with the horseracing integrity and safety act of 2020, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 3051 et seq., as amended. Revenues from the fees under this section must be deposited in the Washington equine industry federal regulatory account created in section 3 of this act. The commission may adopt rules to implement this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 67.16 RCW to read as follows:(1) By July 1, 2027, and by July 1st of each year thereafter, the state treasurer, based upon information provided by the department of revenue, must transfer from the general fund to the Washington equine industry federal regulatory account created in section 3 of this act an amount not to exceed $1,500,000 per fiscal year directly derived from the imposition of state parimutuel and sales and use taxes in the previous calendar year for:(a) Purchases made by or purchases sold and tax collected by a class 1 racing association;(b) Taxes submitted to the commission under RCW 67.16.105; and(c) Fees submitted to the commission under WAC 260-49-070.(2) Following each biennium, the amount not to exceed in subsection (1) of this section may be reviewed and increased based on inflationary calculations as determined by the department of revenue and federal fee amounts as determined by the commission.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 67.16 RCW to read as follows:The Washington equine industry federal regulatory account is created in the state treasury. All receipts transferred to the account under section 2 of this act must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only to pay fees charged by the federal horseracing integrity safety authority or direct required costs as determined by the commission pursuant to the horseracing integrity and safety act of 2020, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 3051 et seq., as amended.--- END ---